California, session 20252026, AB1515.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 1650) is added to Part 6 of Division 2 of the Labor Code, to read: CHAPTER 1. Professional Employer Organizations1650. For purposes of this chapter:(a) “Division” means the Division of Labor Standards Enforcement.(b) “Professional employer organization” (PEO) means a person that meets any of the following criteria:(1) Is certified by the Secretary of the Treasury pursuant to Section 7705 of Title 26 of the United States Code.(2) Is accredited by the Employer Services Assurance Corporation.(3) Provides professional employer services to a client pursuant to a written professional employer agreement intended by the parties to create an ongoing relationship.(c) “Professional employer services” means services pursuant to a professional services agreement that provides for all or substantially all employees of a client and includes all of the following:(1) Reporting employee wages using the federal employer identification number of the PEO.(2) Securing workers’ compensation insurance in compliance with paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) of Section 3602 and Section 3700.(3) Offering employee benefit plans.1651. A person shall not provide, advertise, or otherwise hold oneself out as providing professional employer services in the state unless the person is registered with the division under this chapter.1652. Upon registration, a PEO shall pay an initial registration fee established by the division not to exceed the reasonable cost of providing the registration under this chapter.SECTION 1.Section 6330 of the Labor Code is amended to read:6330.(a)The director shall prepare and submit to the Governor and the Legislature, not later than March 1, an annual report on the division activities. The report shall include, but not be limited to, the following information for the previous calendar year:(1)The amount of funds allocated and spent in enforcement, education and research, and administration by the division.(2)The number of inspections made, and citations issued, by the division.(3)The number of civil penalties assessed, total amount of fines collected, and the number of appeals heard.(4)The number of contractors referred to the Contractors State License Board for hearing, pursuant to Section 7109.5 of the Business and Professions Code, and the total number of these cases resulting in suspension or revocation of a license.(5)The report from the division prepared by the Bureau of Investigations for submission to the director pursuant to Section 6315.3.(6)Recommendations for legislation that would improve the ability of the division to provide safety in places of employment.(b)The report shall be made to the Speaker of the Assembly and the Chairman of the Rules Committee of the Senate, for assignment to the appropriate committee or committees for evaluation.(c)The director shall post the report on the department’s internet website.